Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20261-125.01
Certified public accountant in another state; practice privilege; conditions; limitations.

(1)(a) A person shall have all the practice privileges of a certified public accountant who holds a permit issued under subdivision (1)(a) of section 1-136, including the use of the title or designation certified public accountant or C.P.A., without the need to hold a certificate or a permit issued under subdivision (1)(a) of section 1-136 or to notify or register with the board or pay any fee, if such person:

(i) Has his or her principal place of business outside this state;

(ii) Holds an active license as a certified public accountant from any other state; and

(iii) Was required to show evidence to the licensing body of the other state of having passed the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination and attained the minimum education and experience requirements defined by the board at the time of initial licensure.

(b) However, a person is not eligible to exercise the practice privilege afforded under this section if the person has a permit, certificate, or license under current suspension or revocation for reasons other than nonpayment of fees or failure to comply with continuing professional educational requirements in another state.

(2) Any person exercising the practice privilege afforded under this section and any partnership, limited liability company, or other allowed entity of certified public accountants which employ that person hereby simultaneously consent, as a condition of the exercise of the practice privilege:

(a) To the personal and subject-matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board;

(b) To comply with the Public Accountancy Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(c) That in the event the authorization to engage in the practice of public accountancy in the state of the person's principal place of business is no longer valid, the person will cease offering or rendering professional services in this state individually and on behalf of the person's partnership, limited liability company, or other allowed entity of certified public accountants; and

(d) To the appointment of the state entity which issued the person's authorization to engage in the practice of public accountancy as the person's agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding by the board against the person.

(3) The practice privilege afforded under this section or any other section shall not be interpreted to prevent any governmental body from requiring that public accounting services performed for a governmental body or for an entity regulated by a governmental body be performed by a person or firm holding a permit issued under section 1-136.

(4) Any person who exercises the practice privilege afforded under this section and who, for any entity with its home office in this state, performs attestation services, may only do so through a firm or an affiliated entity which holds a permit issued under section 1-136.

Laws 2009, LB31, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB718, § 5.
July 18, 2026